incubator/apertium-mal/apertium-mal.mal.twol
Alphabet 

! Define your alphabet, each of the individual symbols, here

അ ആ ഇ ഈ ഉ ഊ ഋ ഌ എ ഏ ഐ ഒ ഓ ഔ ക ഖ ഗ ഘ ങ ച ഛ ജ ഝ ഞ ട ഠ ഡ ഢ ണ ത ഥ ദ ധ ന ഩ പ ഫ ബ ഭ മ യ ര റ ല ള ഴ വ  ശ ഷ സ ഹ  
‍
 ാ ി ീ  ു ൂ ൃ ൄ െ േ ൈ ൊ ോ ൌ ് ൎ ം ഃ

 %{y%}:0 %{z%}:0 %{p%}:0 

 %>:0 %»:0 

 ‍

 ; 

Sets

! The vowel on the right is -u
RVowU = ു ; 

! The vowel on the right is -a
RVowA = ക ഖ ഗ ഘ ങ ച ഛ ജ ഝ ഞ ട ഠ ഡ 
                   ഢ ണ ത ഥ ദ ധ ന ഩ പ ഫ ബ ഭ മ യ ര 
                    റ ല ള ഴ വ ശ ഷ സ ഹ   ി െ  ;
 
! The vowel on the right is -m
RVowM =  ം ; 

Rules 

"Epenthesis in clitics ({y} → y)"
%{y%}:യ <=> :RVowA  [ %>: | %»: ]  _ ; 

"Epenthesis in clitics ({y} → v)"
%{y%}:വ <=> :RVowU  [ %>: | %»: ]  _ ; 

"Epenthesis in clitics ({y} → m)"
%{y%}:മ <=> RVowM:  [ %>: | %»: ]  _ ; 

"Remove anusuvara when followed by a morpheme boundary"
ം:0 <=> _ [ %>: | %»: ] ;

"Remove ZWNJ when followed by a morpheme boundary"
‍:0 <=> _  [ %>: | %»: ]  ;

"Remove virama when followed by a morpheme boundary"
്:0 <=> _ (‍:)  [ %>: | %»: ]  ;

"Epenthesis in clitics ({z} → y)"
%{z%}:യ <=> :RVowA  [ %>: | %»: ]  _ ; 

"Epenthesis in clitics ({z} → v)"
%{z%}:വ <=> :RVowU  [ %>: | %»: ]  _ ; 

"Epenthesis in clitics ({z} → v)"
%{z%}:വ <=> RVowM:  [ %>: | %»: ]  _ ; 

"Remove vowel before ി"
Vx:0 <=> _  [ %>: | %»: ] :ി ; 
         _  [ %>: | %»: ] %{p%}: ;
    where Vx in ( ു   ി  ) ;

"r -> ṟ before i"
ര:റ <=> _ ്: ‍: [ %>: | %»: ] (:0) :ി ; 

"r -> ṟ before u"
ര:റ <=> _ ്: ‍: [ %>: | %»: ] (:0) :ു; 


! ലഭ>ിക്കാര്‍»{y}ില്ല	
